Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1030.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 199.2, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 199.2. A. 1. There is hereby re-created, to continue
until July 1, 2024 2028, in accordance with the provisions of the
Oklahoma Sunset Law, a State Board of Cosmetology and Barbering
which shall be composed of eleven (11) members to be appointed by
the Governor and to serve at the pleasure of the Governor.
2. One member shall be appointed from each congressional
district and the additional members shall be appointed at-large.
However, when congressional districts are redrawn, each member
appointed prior to July 1 of the year in which such modification
becomes effective shall complete the current term of office and
appointments made after July 1 of the year in which such
modification becomes effective shall be based on the redrawn
districts. Appointments made after July 1 of the year in which such
modification becomes effective shall be from any redrawn districts
which are not represented by a board member until such time as each
of the modified congressional districts are represented by a board
member. One member shall be a barber appointed at-large.

3. At the time of appointment, the members shall be citizens of
this state, at least twenty-five (25) years of age, and shall be
high school graduates. Six members shall, at the time of
appointment, have had at least five (5) years' continuous practical
experience in the practice of cosmetology in this state; one member
shall be appointed at large and, at the time of the appointment,
have had at least five (5) years' continuous practical experience in
the practice of barbering in this state; one member shall be a lay
person; one member shall be an administrator of a licensed private
cosmetology school; one member shall be an administrator of a
licensed barber school; and one member shall be an administrator of
a public school licensed to teach cosmetology or barbering.
4. No two members shall be graduates of the same cosmetology
school, nor shall they be organizers of or promote the organization
of any cosmetic, beauty, or hairdressers' association. Each of the
eight cosmetology appointees shall continue to be actively engaged
in the profession of cosmetology while serving. No two members
engaged in the profession of barbering shall be organizers of or
promote the organization of any barbering association. Each of the
two barbering appointees shall continue to be actively engaged in
the profession of barbering while serving.
5. If any member retires or ceases to practice his or her
profession during the term of membership on the Board, such terms
shall automatically cease and the Governor shall appoint a like-
qualified person to fulfill the remainder of the term.
B. The terms of office for Board members shall be four (4)
years ending June 30.
C. Each member shall serve until a successor is appointed and
qualified.
D. Six members of the Board shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business.
E. The Governor may remove any member of the Board at any time
at the Governor's discretion. Vacancies shall be filled by
appointment by the Governor for the unexpired portion of the term.
F. The Board shall organize by electing from its membership a
chair and vice-chair, each to serve for a period of one (1) year.
The presiding officer shall not be entitled to vote upon any
question except in the case of a tie vote.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1030 Page 2

Members shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary
traveling expenses as provided by the State Travel Reimbursement
Act.
G. Within thirty (30) days after the end of each fiscal year,
the Board shall make a full report to the Governor of all its
receipts and expenditures, and also a full statement of its work
during the year, together with such recommendations as the Board
deems expedient.
H. The Board may expend funds for suitable office space for the
transaction of its business. The Board shall adopt a common seal
for the use of the executive director in authenticating Board
documents.
I. The Board shall meet at its office for the transaction of
such business as may come before it on the second Monday in January,
March, May, July, September, and November and at such other times as
it may deem advisable.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1030 Page 3

Passed the House of Representatives the 24th day of February,
2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 7th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1030 Page 4